Wisconsin, session 2025, AB998.
do enact as follows:AB998,1Section 1. 118.015 (1m) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:118.015 (1m) (a) (intro.) Beginning in the 2023-24 2026-27 school year and annually at least once every 3 school years thereafter, the council on early literacy curricula shall recommend to the department early literacy curricula and instructional materials for use in the following school year in grades kindergarten to 3. The council on early literacy curricula may recommend only early literacy curricula and instructional materials that satisfy the following criteria:AB998,2Section 2. 118.015 (1m) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:118.015 (1m) (b) 1. By no later than 30 14 days after the department receives recommendations under par. (a), the department shall simultaneously submit to the joint committee on finance proposed and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) the recommendations received under par. (a) and any additional recommendations from the department on early literacy curricula and instructional materials that satisfy the criteria under par. (a) 1. and 2. for use in the following school year. In the submission under this subdivision, the department shall note which recommendations are made by the council on early literacy curricula and which are made by the department. If the cochairpersons of the joint committee on finance do not notify the department within 14 working days after the date of the submittal of the proposed recommendations that the committee has scheduled a meeting to review the proposed recommendations, the department shall adopt the proposed recommendations for use in the following school year. If, within 14 working days after the date of the submittal of the proposed recommendations, the cochairpersons of the committee notify the department that the committee has scheduled a meeting to review the proposed recommendations, the department may not adopt the proposed recommendations unless the committee approves or modifies the proposed recommendations. If the committee modifies the plan, the department may adopt the recommendations only as modified by the committee. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab998 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab998 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB998 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB998 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB998: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting